Hawaii statutes.
§451J-3 Powers and duties of the director.
In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the director may:

(1) Examine and approve the qualifications of all
applicants under this chapter, and issue a license to each successful applicant
granting permission to use the title of marriage and family therapist or
licensed marriage and family therapist in this State pursuant to this chapter
and the rules adopted under this chapter;

(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules pursuant to chapter
91;

(3) Administer, coordinate, and enforce this chapter
and rules;

(4) Discipline a person licensed as a marriage and
family therapist for any cause described by this chapter, or for any violation
of rules, or refuse to license a person for failure to meet licensing
requirements or for any cause that would be grounds for disciplining a licensed
marriage and family therapist; and

(5) Appoint an advisory committee of licensed marriage
and family therapists and members of the public to assist with the implementation
of this chapter and the rules; except that the initial members of the committee
who are marriage and family therapists shall not be required to be licensed
pursuant to this chapter. [L 1998, c 159, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 29, §6]

Note

L 1998, c 159, §4 provides:

"SECTION 4. The director of commerce and consumer
affairs may appoint an administrative assistant and secretary, without regard
to chapters 76 and 77, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to assist with the activities
of the marriage and family [therapist] licensing program."

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next